South Dakota, session 2026, SB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-17B-13 be AMENDED:
12-17B-13. The process of tabulating the votes using the automatic tabulating
equipment must be under the direction of the person in charge of the election, and must
conform to the specifications and requirements of the automatic tabulating equipment.
The results printed by the automatic tabulating equipment are the immediate
unofficial returns. These returns and any cast vote record or ballot images collected by
the automatic tabulating equipment are public records under chapter 1-27. The county
auditor is not required to produce a cast vote record or collection of ballot images, if the
operating software of the automatic tabulating equipment used in a county does not
produce a cast vote record or ballot images.
The results printed by the automatic tabulating equipment must be presented to
the canvassing board for review and certification as the official returns.
For purposes of this section, "ballot image" means a digital rendering or facsimile
of a paper ballot tabulated in the election.
For purposes of this section, "cast vote record" means an electronic record of how
the marks on a ballot are tabulated as a vote for a candidate or other ballot question.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-17B:
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 12-17B-13, the governing body of the
jurisdiction conducting the election may not release any cast vote record or collection of
ballot images if the cast vote record or any ballot image:
(1) Indicates the date, time, or order in which a ballot was cast;

26.265.22 2 114
(2) Contains any unredacted personal information that may be used to identify the
voter who cast the ballot;
(3) Provides the tabulating equipment's data in the order in which the data was
generated;
(4) Does not include all the ballots that were cast at the precinct polling place or vote
center;
(5) Is from a precinct polling place or vote center in which fewer than one hundred
ballots were cast, and the cast vote record or ballot images have not been:
(a) Redacted to exclude the ballot style name, ballot style number, and any
contest that is unique to the precinct; and
(b) Combined with the cast vote record or ballot images from at least one other
precinct or vote center to be released as a collection that contains more
than one hundred ballots; or
(6) Is related to a ballot style of which fewer than one hundred ballots were cast, and
the cast vote record or ballot images have not been:
(a) Redacted to exclude the ballot style name, ballot style number, and any
contest that is unique to the ballot style; and
(b) Combined with the cast vote record or ballot images related to another
ballot style to be released as a collection that contains more than one
hundred ballots.
The jurisdiction conducting the election is responsible for all expenses associated
with producing, storing, archiving, and releasing a cast vote record or a collection of ballot
images.
SB114 ENROLLED

26.265.22 3 114
An Act to provide for the publication of ballot images and the cast vote record of automatic
tabulating equipment.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 114
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 114 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB114 ENROLLED